District of Columbia statutes.
26-209

Advancements — Participation of all shares in profits.

The shares advanced upon shall participate equally with the other shares in the profits and the amounts paid by the advanced shareholders, together with such proportion of the profits accrued or such rate of interest as said bylaws may determine, the same as allowed on shares withdrawn not advanced upon, less all fines and a proportionate part of losses and other charges incurred.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1299, ch. 854, § 694
1981 Ed., § 26-509.
1973 Ed., § 26-408.